Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
JUDGES

31-10-401. Appointment of election judges.

At least fifteen days before each municipal election, the governing body shall appoint the judges of election. Each judge of election shall be an elector registered to vote in Colorado and shall be at least eighteen years of age. The clerk shall make and file in his office a list of all persons so appointed, giving their names, addresses, and precincts. Such list shall be a public record and shall be subject to inspection and examination during office hours by any qualified elector of the municipality with the right to make copies thereof. The governing body may by resolution delegate to the clerk the authority and responsibility to appoint judges of election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1045, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1499, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 329, § 87, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 797, § 17, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-401 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-402. Number of judges.

The governing body, or the clerk if authorized pursuant to section 31-10-401, shall appoint for each municipal election precinct at least three judges of election and such additional judges as deemed necessary.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1045, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1) R&RE, p. 1177, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1500, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-402 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-403. Certificates of appointment.

Immediately after the appointment of the judges of election, the clerk shall issue certificates under his official seal certifying such appointments in each precinct. He shall mail one certificate to each person appointed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1045, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1500, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-403 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-404. Acceptances.

With each certificate of appointment transmitted by the clerk to the judges of election, there shall be enclosed a form for acceptance of the appointment. Each person appointed as an election judge shall file his acceptance in the office of the clerk within seven days after the mailing by the clerk of the certificate of appointment and the acceptance form. Failure of any person appointed as a judge of election to file an acceptance within said seven days shall result in a vacancy. Such vacancy shall be filled in the same way the original appointment was made.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1045, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1500, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-404 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-405. Vacancies.

If for any reason any person appointed as a judge of election refuses, fails, or is unable to serve, it is the duty of the person or any other judge of election to immediately notify the clerk. The clerk shall forthwith appoint another qualified person to serve in the place of the person.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1046, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1500, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1709, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-405 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-406. Removal of judges.

Any judge of election who has neglected his duty, or has committed, encouraged, or connived at any fraud in connection therewith, or has violated any of the election laws, or has knowingly permitted others to do so, or has been convicted of any felony, or has violated his oath, or has committed any act which interferes or tends to interfere with a fair and honest election shall be summarily removed by the clerk.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1046, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1500, § 11, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-406 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-407. Oath of judges.

Before any votes are taken at any municipal election, the judges of election shall severally take an oath or affirmation in the following form:

The judges of election may administer the oaths or affirmations to each other. Each judge shall record and sign any such oaths or affirmations administered by him and shall attach the record to the pollbook.

"I, ...., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen of the United States and the state of Colorado; that I am a registered elector in Colorado; that I will perform the duties of judge according to law and the best of my ability; that I will studiously endeavor to prevent fraud, deceit, and abuse in conducting the same; that I will not try to ascertain how any elector voted, nor will I disclose how any elector voted if, in the discharge of my duties as judge, such knowledge shall come to me, unless called upon to disclose the same before some court; and that I will not disclose the result of the votes until the polls have closed."

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1046, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1500, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1709, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-407 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-408. Compensation of judges.

The judges of election at any municipal election shall receive in full compensation for their services as judges of election not less than five dollars and not more than the maximum amount allowed by statute for payment to the judges of the general election of the state of Colorado, as determined by the governing body of the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1046, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1501, § 13, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-408 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-409. Compensation for delivery of election returns and other election papers.

The judges of election in each precinct shall select one of their number to deliver the election returns, registration book or list, ballot boxes, if any, and other election papers and supplies to the office of the clerk or to such other place as the clerk may designate as the counting center. The judge so selected shall be paid not more than four dollars for the performance of such service.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1046, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1177, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-409 as it existed prior to 1975.